Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB299.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 527 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "machine gun" means a machinegun as defined in 26
U.S.C. sec. 5845.
(2) A person is guilty of possession of a machine gun conversion device when he or
she knowingly possesses, obtains, receives, sells, or uses a part or combination of
parts designed and intended to convert a handgun into a machine gun.
(3) This section shall not apply to:
(a) A state or local law enforcement officer while acting in an official capacity;
(b) A person who owns or has in his or her possession, control, care, or custody
a firearm, part, or combination of parts that are registered in the National
Firearms Registration and Transfer Record maintained by the Bureau of
Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives or is otherwise not subject to
that registration requirement; or
(c) Any part, combination of parts, or device designed or intended to increase a
firearm's rate of fire but does not enable a semiautomatic firearm to fire
more than two (2) shots, without manual reloading, by a single function of
the trigger.
(4) Possession of a machine gun conversion device is a Class C felony.
Page 1 of 1
HB029910.100 - 8 - XXXX 3/2/2026 4:18 PM GA